Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2806
Proposed proprietary budget statement; hearing; procedure; adopted statement; filing.

(1) After a proposed proprietary budget statement is filed with the municipal clerk, the governing body shall conduct a public hearing on such statement. Notice of the time and place of the hearing, a summary of the proposed proprietary budget statement, and notice that the full proposed proprietary budget statement is available for public review with the municipal clerk during normal business hours shall be published one time at least five days prior to the hearing in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation within the governing body's jurisdiction or by mailing to each resident within the governing body's jurisdiction.

(2) After such hearing, the proposed proprietary budget statement shall be adopted or amended and adopted as amended, and a written record shall be kept of such hearing. If the adopted proprietary budget statement reflects a change from the proposed proprietary budget statement presented at the hearing, a copy of the adopted proprietary budget statement shall be filed with the municipal clerk within twenty days after its adoption and published in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation within the governing body's jurisdiction or by mailing to each resident within the governing body's jurisdiction.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 197.